Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 5. Water Rights and Liens

§ 36-7-501.
When water rights attach to land.

The water rights to all lands acquired under the provisions of this act shall attach to and become appurtenant to the land as soon as title passes from the United States to the state.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 955; C.S. 1910, § 681; C.S. 1920, § 794; R.S. 1931, § 91-726; C.S. 1945, § 24-422; W.S. 1957, § 36-114.

Cross references. —

As to administration and control of water rights, see chapter 3 of title 41.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following §

36-7-103

.

Right to use water for irrigation of arid lands is property right

acquired by appropriation; that is, by diversion and application of water to beneficial uses. North Side Canal Co. v. State Board of Equalization, 17 F.2d 55, 1926 U.S. App. LEXIS 2732 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1926), cert. denied, 274 U.S. 740, 47 S. Ct. 586, 71 L. Ed. 1320, 1927 U.S. LEXIS 158 (U.S. 1927).

Water rights of entryman under this section become appurtenant to land when title passes from United States to state. Ver Straten v. Board of Comm'rs, 35 Wyo. 67, 246 P. 916,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1926).

Quoted

in

Dechert v. Christopulos, 604 P.2d 1039,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1980).

Stated

in

Bruegman v. Johnson Ranches, Inc., 520 P.2d 489,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 36-7-502.
First and prior lien on water right.

Any person, company or association furnishing water for any tract of land shall have a first and prior lien on said water right and land upon which said water is used, for all deferred payments for said water right; said lien to be in all respects prior to any and all other liens created or attempted to be created by the owner and possessor of said land; said lien to remain in full force and effect until the last deferred payment for the water right is fully paid and satisfied according to the terms of the contract under which said water right was acquired.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 956; C.S. 1910, § 682; C.S. 1920, § 795; R.S. 1931, § 91-727; C.S. 1945, § 24-423; W.S. 1957, § 36-115.

Company that constructed ditch has interest therein to which lien may attach

for work and material. Lakeview Canal Co. v. R. Hardesty Mfg. Co., 31 Wyo. 182, 224 P. 853,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 36-7-503.
Recording of contract; foreclosure of lien.

The contract for the water right upon which the aforesaid lien is founded, whether heretofore or hereafter executed, shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county where said land is situate; and upon the default of any of the deferred payments secured by any lien under the provisions of this article, the person, company of persons, association or incorporated company holding or owning said lien, may, within ten (10) years after the last maturing deferred payment secured by such lien shall have become due, foreclose the same according to the terms and conditions of the contract granting and selling to the settler the water right.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 957; C.S. 1910, § 683; C.S. 1920, § 796; R.S. 1931, § 91-728; Laws 1945, ch. 123, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-424; W.S. 1957, § 36-116.

§ 36-7-504.
Notice and place of foreclosure sale; duties of sheriff; limitation on bids.

All sales shall be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the county where said land and water right is situate for six (6) consecutive weeks, and shall be sold to the highest bidder at the front door of the courthouse of the county, or such place as may be agreed upon by the terms of the aforesaid contract. And the sheriff of said county shall in all such cases give all notices of sale and shall sell all such land and water rights and shall make and execute a certificate of sale to the purchaser thereof, and at such sale no person, company of persons, association or incorporated company, owning and holding any lien shall bid in or purchase any land or water right at a greater price than the amount due on said deferred payment for said water right and land, and the costs incurred in making the sale of said land and water right.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 958; C.S. 1910, § 684; C.S. 1920, § 797; R.S. 1931, § 91-729; C.S. 1945, § 24-425; W.S. 1957, § 36-117.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notice of foreclosure of mortgaged premises, see §§

34-4-104

and

34-4-105

.

§ 36-7-505.
Redemption.

At any time within nine (9) months after the foreclosure sale by the sheriff, of the land and water rights as aforesaid, the original owner against whom the lien has been foreclosed, may apply to the person, company of persons, association or incorporated company purchasing at such sale, to redeem such land and water rights, and the purchaser shall assign the certificate of sale of such land and water rights to such original owner, upon the payment by him within such nine (9) months, of the amount of the lien for which the same was sold at such foreclosure sale, together with the interest, costs and fixed charges thereon. Where the lienholder becomes the purchaser at such foreclosure sale, if such lands and water rights are not redeemed by the original owner within nine (9) months, then at any time within three (3) months after the expiration of such nine (9) months, any person desiring to settle upon and use such land and water rights, may apply to the purchaser at such foreclosure sale to redeem such land and water rights, and such purchaser shall assign the certificate of sale of such land and water rights to the person desiring to redeem the same, upon the payment by him, within such three (3) months, of the amount of the lien for which the same was sold at such foreclosure sale, together with the interest, costs and fixed charges thereon.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 959; C.S. 1910, § 685; C.S. 1920, § 798; R.S. 1931, § 91-730; C.S. 1945, § 24-426; W.S. 1957, § 36-118.

§ 36-7-506.
Redemption; recording certificate of sale.

Upon issuing any certificate of sale, it shall be the duty of the sheriff to file for record in the office of the county clerk of the county where such land is situated, a certified copy of such certificate of sale, and in case the original owner shall redeem the land and water rights sold as aforesaid, he shall file for record in the office of such county clerk, the certificate of sale assigned to him by the purchaser as aforesaid, upon his redemption of such land and water rights.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 960; C.S. 1910, § 686; C.S. 1920, § 799; R.S. 1931, § 91-731; C.S. 1945, § 24-427; W.S. 1957, § 36-119.

§ 36-7-507.
Redemption; issuance of deed.

In case the land and water rights shall be redeemed by any person other than the original owner, the sheriff shall, upon presentation of such certificate, issue a deed for such land and water rights to the person so redeeming the same. If the land and water rights shall not be redeemed by any person within the time and in the manner hereinbefore provided, it shall be the duty of the sheriff, upon presentation of the certificate of sale by the original purchaser, to issue a deed to such purchaser.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 961; C.S. 1910, § 687; C.S. 1920, § 800; R.S. 1931, § 91-732; C.S. 1945, § 24-428; W.S. 1957, § 36-120.

§ 36-7-508.
Proceeds of foreclosure sale; fees of sheriff.

Where such lands and water rights are not purchased by the lienholder of such foreclosure sale, it shall be the duty of the sheriff to first pay the lienholder out of the proceeds of such sale, the amount of the lien together with all interest, costs and fixed charges thereon, and to pay any balance remaining to the person against whom such lien has been foreclosed, and for his services in such cases the sheriff shall receive the same fees as are provided by law in civil cases.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 962; C.S. 1910, § 688; C.S. 1920, § 801; R.S. 1931, § 91-733; C.S. 1945, § 24-429; W.S. 1957, § 36-121.

Cross references. —

As to fees of sheriff in civil cases, see §

18-3-608

.

§ 36-7-509.
Authority to purchase water rights; lease and sale; disposition of moneys received.

The board of land commissioners is hereby authorized to purchase water rights or proportionate interests in canals, reservoirs or irrigation systems for the purpose of reclaiming school and other granted lands. Lands for which water rights become appurtenant may be leased by the board at a price which will return an equitable income, or may be sold upon the following terms and conditions:

The land shall be offered at public auction at the front door of the courthouse of the county in which the land is situated, after being advertised for four (4) weeks, as required by law;

Thirty percent (30%) of the purchase price of the land must be paid in cash on the day of sale;

The purchaser shall, before the sale is consummated, enter into a contract for the purchase of a water right or proportionate interest in the irrigation system which will supply water for the said land, which may be conditioned on not to exceed twenty (20) annual payments with interest at six percent (6%) per annum;

Delinquent payments shall bear interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum until paid.

Moneys received for the sale of land, and the interest thereon, shall be placed in the proper permanent land fund account in accordance with the purpose for which the land was granted to the state. Moneys received from the sale of water right contracts and the interest thereon shall be turned in to the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 63, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 695; C.S. 1920, § 808; R.S. 1931, § 91-740; C.S. 1945, § 24-438; W.S. 1957, § 36-122; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to legal rate of interest, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 36-7-510.
Filing of reports for future use.

The board of land commissioners shall from time to time secure reports from the state engineer or his deputies or assistants or from other qualified persons covering the lands for which it is proposed to secure water rights and lands for which applications to purchase have been filed, and shall file same until it shall seem to the advantage of the state to secure water rights for the said land or to offer same for sale.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 63, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 696; C.S. 1920, § 809; R.S. 1931, § 91-741; C.S. 1945, § 24-439; W.S. 1957, § 36-123.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1909, ch. 63, § 4, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.